Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,181
State identification cards; issuance; requirements; form; delivery; cancellation.

(1) Each applicant for a state identification card shall provide the information and documentation required by sections 60-484, 60-484.04, and 60-484.07. The form of the state identification card shall comply with section 60-4,117. The applicant shall present an issuance certificate to the county treasurer for a state identification card. Department personnel or the county treasurer shall collect the fees as prescribed in section 60-4,115 and issue a receipt to the applicant which is valid up to thirty days. The state identification card shall be delivered to the applicant as provided in section 60-4,113.

(2) The director may summarily cancel any state identification card, and any judge or magistrate may order a state identification card canceled in a judgment of conviction, if the application or information presented by the applicant contains any false or fraudulent statements which were deliberately and knowingly made as to any matter material to the issuance of the card or if the application or information presented by the applicant does not contain required or correct information. Any state identification card so obtained shall be void from the date of issuance. Any judgment of conviction ordering cancellation of a state identification card shall be transmitted to the director who shall cancel the card.

(3) No person shall be a holder of a state identification card and an operator's license at the same time.

Laws 1989, LB 284, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 130;

Laws 1992, LB 1178, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 491, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 576;

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1073, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 21, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 22;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 11;

Laws 1999, LB 147, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 41;

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 34, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 29;

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 559, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 26;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 23;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 22;

Laws 2016, LB666, § 9;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 33;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 38.